Vermont, session 2025-2026, H422.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds that:
VT LEG #381096 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.422
2025 Page 2 of 4
(1) groundwater testing in proximity to sites contaminated by hazardous
materials is critically important to protecting public and private water supply
sources;
(2) high-quality laboratory analysis of water samples from groundwater
monitoring wells at contaminated sites must be a mandatory component of
oversight of the monitoring of contaminated sites;
(3) at contaminated sites where a post closure fund is available to pay
for groundwater monitoring, it is in the best interests of the State and the entity
responsible for the site to keep the cost of groundwater testing low so as to
ensure that the cost of groundwater monitoring will not exhaust funding
available from the post closure fund;
(4) using the State Agricultural and Environmental Laboratory (State
Laboratory) to conduct the testing of groundwater samples from contaminated
sites assists in keeping monitoring costs lower than if testing of samples
occurred at private laboratories;
(5) the State and all water users that might be affected by contamination
in their drinking water supply will benefit from timely, affordable, and
accurate groundwater testing data; and
(6) the State, through the Agency of Natural Resources, should require
and facilitate the testing of groundwater samples from contaminated sites at the
State Laboratory in order to allow for the lowest cost possible for testing.
VT LEG #381096 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.422
2025 Page 3 of 4
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 6608 is amended to read:
§ 6608. RECORDS; REPORTS; MONITORING
(a) For purposes of implementation of this chapter, the Secretary shall
adopt, and revise as appropriate, rules that prescribe:
(1) the establishment and maintenance of such records;
(2) the making of such reports;
(3) the taking of such samples, and the performing of such tests or
analyses;
(4) the installing, calibrating, using, and maintaining of such monitoring
equipment or methods; and
(5) the providing of such other information as may be necessary.
* * *
(g) When the Secretary under this chapter requires groundwater monitoring
of a site where hazardous materials were released, the Secretary shall require
that the testing of groundwater samples from the contaminated site occurs at
the State Agricultural and Environmental Laboratory unless:
(1) the State Agricultural and Environmental Laboratory lacks the
ability to conduct the necessary testing; or
(2) testing at a private laboratory would result in significant costs
savings to the State or the owner of the contaminated site, as approved by the
Secretary.
VT LEG #381096 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.422
2025 Page 4 of 4
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #381096 v.1